Illinois, session 104th, HB2329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Union Employee Health and Benefits 5Protection Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 60/1)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the the Union Employee 8Health and Benefits Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 88-207.)